bg-BG: Артикули за животни и домашни любимци > Артикули за домашни любимци > Консумативи за влечуги и земноводни > Местообитания на влечуги и земноводни: Аквариуми; Палудариуми; Терариуми; Вивариуми
tr: Hayvanlar ve Evcil Hayvan Ürünleri > Evcil Hayvan Ürünleri > Sürüngen ve Amfibi Ürünleri > Sürüngen ve Amfibi Ortamları: Akvaryumlar; Paludaryumlar; Teraryumlar; Vivaryumlar
ja: ペット・ペット用品 > ペット用品 > 爬虫類・両生類用品 > 爬虫類・両生類飼育ケージ: 水槽; パルダリウム; テラリウム; ビバリウム
it: Articoli per animali > Animali domestici - Articoli > Articoli per rettili e anfibi > Habitat per rettili e anfibi: Acquari; Paludari; Terrari; Vivariums
ro-RO: Animale și articole pentru animale de companie > Articole pentru animale de companie > Articole pentru reptile/amfibieni > Habitate pentru reptile/amfibieni: Acvarii; Paludarii; Terarii; Vivarii
pl: Zwierzęta i artykuły dla zwierząt > Artykuły dla zwierząt > Artykuły dla gadów i płazów > Terraria dla gadów i płazów: Akwaria; Paludaria; Terraria; Wiwaria
es: Productos para mascotas y animales > Productos para mascotas > Productos para reptiles y anfibios > Terrarios para reptiles y anfibios: Acuarios; Paludarios; Terrarios; Vivarios
hr-HR: Životinje i potrepštine za kućne ljubimce > Potrepštine za kućne ljubimce > Pribor za gmazove i vodozemce > Staništa gmazova i vodozemaca: Akvariji; Paludariji; Terariji; Vivariji
zh-TW: 動物/寵物補給品 > 寵物用品 > 爬蟲/兩棲類用品 > 爬蟲/兩棲動物箱: 水族箱/魚缸; 沼澤缸; 陸生缸; 兩棲生態缸
de: Tiere & Tierbedarf > Haustierbedarf > Reptilien- & Amphibienbedarf > Reptilien- & Amphibiengehege: Aquarien; Paludarien; Terrarien; Vivarien
hu: Állatok és kisállatkellékek > Háziállat-kellékek > Hüllő- és kétéltűkellékek > Hüllő- és kétéltűélőhelyek: Akváriumok; Paludáriumok; Terráriumok; Viváriumok
da: Dyr og tilbehør til kæledyr > Tilbehør til kæledyr > Tilbehør til reptiler og padder > Terrarier: Akvarier; Paludarier; Terrarier; Vivarier
en: Animals & Pet Supplies > Pet Supplies > Reptile & Amphibian Supplies > Reptile & Amphibian Habitats: Aquariums; Paludariums; Terrariums; Vivariums
ko: 동물/반려동물 용품 > 반려동물 용품 > 파충류/양서류 용품 > 파충류/양서류 집: 수족관; 팔루다리움; 테라리움; 비바리움
sk-SK: Potreby pre zvieratá a domácich miláčikov > Potreby pre domácich miláčikov > Potreby pre plazy a obojživelníky > Biotopy plazov a obojživelníkov: Akváriá; Paludáriá; Teráriá; Vivária
sv: Djur och tillbehör till husdjur > Tillbehör till husdjur > Tillbehör till reptiler och amfibier > Terrarier för reptiler och amfibier: Akvarier; Paludarier; Terrarier; Vivarier
pt-PT: Artigos para animais e animais estimação > Artigos para animais > Artigos para répteis e anfíbios > Habitats para répteis e anfíbios: Aquários; Aquaterrários; Terrários; Biotérios
lt-LT: Gyvūnai ir prekės naminiams gyvūnams > Prekės naminiams gyvūnams > Prekės ropliams ir varliagyviams > Indai ropliams ir varliagyviams: Akvariumai; Paludariumai; Terariumai; Vivariumai
vi: Đồ dùng cho động vật & thú cưng > Đồ dùng cho thú cưng > Sản phẩm nuôi và chăm sóc bò sát & lưỡng cư > Chỗ ở của động vật lưỡng cư và loài bò sát: Bể cá; Hồ bán cạn kiểu Paludarium; Hồ bán cạn kiểu Terrarium; Hồ bán cạn kiểu Vivarium
ru: Животные и товары для питомцев > Товары для домашних животных > Товары для рептилий и амфибий > Емкости для содержания рептилий и амфибий: Аквариумы; Палюдариумы; Террариумы; Виварии
fi: Eläinten ja lemmikkieläinten tarvikkeet > Lemmikkieläinten tarvikkeet > Matelijoiden ja sammakkoeläinten tarvikkeet > Matelijoiden ja sammakkoeläinten asuinpaikat: Akvaariot; Paludariumit; Terraariot; Vivariumit
pt-BR: Animais e produtos para animais de estimação > Suprimentos para animais de estimação > Suprimentos para répteis e anfíbios > Moradias para répteis e anfíbios: Aquários; Paludários; Terrários; Biotérios
sl-SI: Živali in pripomočki za hišne ljubljenčke > Pripomočki za hišne ljubljenčke > Pripomočki za plazilce in dvoživke > Terariji za plazilce in dvoživke: Akvariji; Paludariji; Terariji; Vivariji
cs: Chovatelství > Potřeby pro domácí zvířata > Potřeby pro plazy a obojživelníky > Domky pro plazy a obojživelníky: Akvária; Paludária; Terária; Vivária
th: อุปกรณ์สำหรับสัตว์และสัตว์เลี้ยง > อุปกรณ์สัตว์เลี้ยง > อุปกรณ์สำหรับสัตว์เลื้อยคลานและสัตว์สะเทินน้ำสะเทินบก > ที่อยู่อาศัยสำหรับสัตว์เลื้อยคลานและสัตว์สะเทินน้ำสะเทินบก: ตู้ปลา; ตู้ครึ่งบกครึ่งน้ำพาลูดาเรียม; สวนในขวดแก้วเทอร์ราเรียม; สวนในขวดแก้ววิวาเรียม
zh-CN: 动物/宠物用品 > 宠物用品 > 爬行/两栖动物用品 > 爬行/两栖动物住所: 水族箱/鱼缸; 水陆两栖生态缸; 饲养箱; 陆地动物饲养所
fr: Animaux et articles pour animaux de compagnie > Articles pour animaux de compagnie > Accessoires pour reptiles et amphibiens > Terrariums pour reptiles et amphibiens: Aquariums; Paludariums; Terrariums; Vivariums
el: Ζώα και προμήθειες για κατοικίδια ζώα > Προμήθειες για κατοικίδια ζώα > Προμήθειες για ερπετά και αμφίβια > Ενδιαιτήματα για ερπετά & αμφίβια: Ενυδρεία; Paludariums; Terrariums; Vivariums
nl: Dieren > Benodigdheden voor huisdieren > Benodigdheden voor reptielen en amfibieën > Verblijven voor reptielen en amfibieën: Aquariums; Paludaria; Terraria; Vivaria
nb: Produkter til dyr og husdyr > Husdyrprodukter > Produkter for reptiler og amfibier > Habitater for reptiler og amfibier: Akvarier; Paludarier; Terrarier; Vivarier